District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.05

Revocation of a comfort care order.

A patient, or the patient’s authorized decision-maker or surrogate, may revoke a comfort care order at any time by:

(1)

Removing, cutting, destroying, defacing, or discarding the comfort care bracelet;

(2)

Directing another person to remove, cut, destroy, deface, or discard the bracelet in the presence of the patient, authorized decision-maker, or surrogate; or

(3)

Communicating directly to EMS personnel the patient’s, authorized decision-maker’s, or surrogate’s intent to revoke the comfort care order.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 6, 48 DCR 27